Hawaii statutes.
§286-134 Employing unlicensed driver.
No person shall employ as a driver of a certain category of motor vehicle any
person who is not licensed under this part to operate that category of motor
vehicle. [L 1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-134; am L 1970, c 164, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next